Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201853-119.01
Fire safety inspection; fee.

The commission may request the State Fire Marshal to inspect for fire safety pursuant to section 81-502 any premises for which an annually renewable retail license or bottle club license, or renewal of such a license, is sought. The State Fire Marshal shall assess a fee for such inspection pursuant to section 81-505.01 which shall be payable by the licensee or applicant for a license. The authority to make such investigations may be delegated to qualified local fire prevention personnel pursuant to section 81-502.

Laws 1983, LB 498, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 485, § 7;

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 8.
July 19, 2018